tasks/task3/verbs.lexc
!!! verbs.lexc
!!! Leonel Figueiredo de Alencar leonel.de.alencar@ufc.br
!!! August 22, 2022

Multichar_Symbols +V +FUT +COND +IMPF +1 +2 +3 +SG +PL

LEXICON Root
compr^ ThematicVowel1;
vend^  ThematicVowel2;

LEXICON ThematicVowel1
a Lemma;

LEXICON ThematicVowel2
e Lemma;

LEXICON Lemma
r:^ PartOfSpeech;

LEXICON PartOfSpeech
+V:0  MoodTense;

LEXICON MoodTense
+FUT:re Marked1SG;
+IMPF:va Unmarked1SG;
+COND:ria Unmarked1SG;

LEXICON Unmarked1SG
+1+SG:^ #;
  Common;

LEXICON Marked1SG
+1+SG:^i #;
  Common;

LEXICON Common
+2+SG:^s #;
+3+SG:^ #;
+1+PL:^mos #;
+2+PL:^is #;
+3+PL:^m #;
